Massachusetts, session 194th, H5411.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 51D of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
Each year from October 1 through February 1 of the following year and in accordance
with the latest recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or of the state department of public health, each
hospital shall offer, prior to discharge, immunizations against influenza virus to all inpatients
sixty-five years of age and older, unless contraindicated, and contingent upon the availability of
the vaccine.
of 1